Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3361, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Rules. new text begin (a) new text end The board shall, by rule, prescribe the requirements, duration, contents, and standards for successful completion of certified training programs for license holders, qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, and employees, including: (1) for those individuals who are armed with a firearm, training in the proper use of, and the risks and dangers arising from the use of, firearms; (2) for those individuals who are armed with a weapon, training in the proper use of, and the risks and dangers arising from the use of, weapons other than firearms, including, but not limited to, bludgeons, nightsticks, batons, chemical weapons, and electronic incapacitation devices, and restraint or immobilization techniques; (3) for those individuals who are armed with a firearm or armed with a weapon, training in first aid and alternatives to the use of force, including advantages to not using force and specifically when force should not be used; (4) for those individuals who are armed with a firearm or armed with a weapon, training in the legal limitations on the justifiable use of force and deadly force as specified in sections 609.06 and 609.065; (5) standards for weapons and equipment issued to or carried or used by those individuals; (6) preassignment or on-the-job training, or its equivalent, required before applicants new text begin and the applicant's qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, and employees new text end may be certified as having completed training; and (7) continuing training for license holders, qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, employees, individuals armed with a firearm, and individuals armed with a weapon. new text begin (b) The board's rules prescribing preassignment training under paragraph (a), clause (6), and continuing training under paragraph (a), clause (7), must address, at a minimum, the following: new text end new text begin (1) community health and wellness, including drug and alcohol addiction, homelessness, and mental illness; new text end new text begin (2) first aid, including training in administering cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), use of automated external defibrillators (AED), and administering opiate antagonists; new text end new text begin (3) conflict and crisis de-escalation strategies and techniques for responding to incidents of violence, persons impaired by alcohol or a controlled substance, and persons who are suffering from a mental health crisis; new text end new text begin (4) orientation to the security industry, including industry standards for reporting incidents and preparing written incident reports; new text end new text begin (5) orientation to the entities responsible for public safety and the entities' duties and roles; new text end new text begin (6) the legal and industry standards for how license holders and license holders' agents and employees should interact with employees of other entities responsible for ensuring public safety; new text end new text begin (7) responding to disruptions in building operations, including electrical outages, water disruption, water leaks, flooding, elevator service disruptions, and elevator entrapments; and new text end new text begin (8) identifying internal and external threats to buildings and the buildings' occupants. new text end new text begin (c) The board must establish an implementation plan for existing license holders to comply with the additional continuing training requirements provided under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3361, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Required contents. The rules adopted by the board must require: (1) deleted text begin 12deleted text end new text begin 40new text end hours of preassignment or on-the-job certified training within the first 21 days of employment, or evidence that the employee has successfully completed equivalent training before the start of employment. Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, this clause is satisfied if the employee provides a prospective employer with a certificate or a copy of a certificate demonstrating that the employee successfully completed this training prior to employment with a different Minnesota licensee and completed this training within three previous calendar years, or successfully completed this training with a Minnesota licensee while previously employed with a Minnesota licensee. The certificate or a copy of the certificate is the property of the employee who completed the training, regardless of who paid for the training or how training was provided. Upon a current or former employee's request, a current or former licensed employer must provide a copy of a certificate demonstrating the employee's successful completion of training to the current or former employee. The current or former licensed employer must not charge the employee a fee for a copy of the certificate. The employee who completed the training is entitled to access a copy of the certificate at no charge according to sections 181.960 to 181.966. A current or former employer must comply with sections 181.960 to 181.966; (2) certification by the board of completion of certified training for a license holder, qualified representative, Minnesota manager, partner, and employee to carry or use a firearm, a weapon other than a firearm, or an immobilizing or restraint technique; and (3) deleted text begin sixdeleted text end new text begin 24new text end hours a year of certified continuing training for all license holders, qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, and employees, and an additional six hours a year for individuals who are armed with firearms or armed with weapons, which must include annual certification of the individual. An individual may not carry or use a weapon while undergoing on-the-job training under this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end